District of Columbia statutes.
16-4424

Modification or correction of award.

(a)

Upon motion made within 90 days after the movant receives notice of the award pursuant to § 16-4419 or within 90 days after the movant receives notice of a modified or corrected award pursuant to § 16-4420, the court shall modify or correct the award if:

(1)

There was an evident mathematical miscalculation or an evident mistake in the description of a person, thing, or property referred to in the award;

(2)

The arbitrator has made an award on a claim not submitted to the arbitrator and the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the decision upon the claims submitted; or

(3)

The award is imperfect in a matter of form not affecting the merits of the decision on the claims submitted.

(b)

If a motion made under subsection (a) of this section is granted, the court shall modify or correct and confirm the award as modified or corrected. Otherwise, unless a motion to vacate is pending, the court shall confirm the award.

(c)

A motion to modify or correct an award pursuant to this section may be joined with a motion to vacate the award.

(d)

Irrespective of the time periods established in subsection (a) of this section and § 16-4423(c), a consumer may also seek to modify or vacate an award issued pursuant to a consumer arbitration agreement within 30 days of receiving notice of a motion to confirm the award.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 24 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).
This section is referenced in § 16-4404, § 16-4418, § 16-4420, § 16-4422, and § 16-4425.